Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-130
Emergency Revolving Fund; amount; source; accounting.

An Emergency Revolving Fund, not to exceed three thousand dollars for any one institution, upon order of the Department of Health and Human Services, shall be drawn from the State Treasurer, to be used by the chief executive officer of each institution as an emergency cash fund. The fund shall be drawn from the general maintenance appropriation for the department. An accounting of this fund shall be made by each executive officer once each month to the department.

Laws 1913, c. 179, § 15, p. 541;

R.S.1913, § 7193;

C.S.1922, § 6844;

C.S.1929, § 83-115;

Laws 1941, c. 186, § 1, p. 754;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 83-115;

R.S.1943, § 83-130;

Laws 1951, c. 321, § 1, p. 1093;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 909;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 785.